Montana, session 2025, HB116.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Remote appearance by counsel -- definitions. (1) All courts shall
establish a consistent, predictable process for attorneys to appear remotely in court.
(2) (a) Except as provided in subsection (2)(b), an attorney assigned pursuant to 47-1-104(4) who
is appearing in court for a nonsubstantive hearing may appear remotely. IF APPEARING REMOTELY, THE ATTORNEY
SHALL USE A CAMERA TO APPEAR ONSCREEN.
(b) A court may order an attorney to appear in person for a specific nonsubstantive hearing if the
court finds good cause for the attorney's personal presence and issues an order providing the legal and factual
basis for good cause at least 5 business days before the specified hearing.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (2), the term "good cause" includes a court's lack of
available technological resources or capacity to accommodate having the attorney appear remotely.
(3) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Appear remotely" means to participate in a hearing through the use of two-way electronic
audio-video communication that allows:
(i) all of the participants to be heard in the courtroom by all present and allows the party speaking
to be seen; and
(ii) a defendant or person represented by counsel assigned pursuant to 47-1-104(4) to see and
communicate privately with the defendant's or person's attorney.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 116

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0116.2
(b) "Nonsubstantive hearing" means a court event in which the substantive outcome of the matter
will not be decided during the event, including:
(i) arraignments and initial appearances;
(ii) bond and bail hearings;
(iii) status hearings, conferences, and court check-ins;
(iv) hearings for the purpose of scheduling;
(v) omnibus hearings;
(vi) calendar calls; and
(vii) other hearings in which substantive arguments or testimony will not be heard.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 3, chapter 1, part 3, and the provisions of Title 3, chapter 1, part 3, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 116